Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202648-3606
Student-athlete; obtain professional representation; effect; postsecondary institutions; education and training.

(1) No postsecondary institution or collegiate athletic association shall penalize a student-athlete or prevent a student-athlete from fully participating in an intercollegiate sport because such student-athlete obtains professional representation in relation to a contract or legal matter related to the use of the student-athlete's name, image, or likeness rights or athletic reputation.

(2) No collegiate athletic association shall penalize a postsecondary institution or prevent a postsecondary institution from fully participating in an intercollegiate sport because a student-athlete participating in an intercollegiate sport for such postsecondary institution obtains professional representation in relation to a contract or legal matter related to the use of the student-athlete's name, image, or likeness rights or athletic reputation.

(3) A postsecondary institution may offer education and training to student-athletes to aid them in understanding the opportunities that may become available to them for the use of their name, image, or likeness rights or athletic reputation, including education in the areas of networking and communication, brand-building and management, financial literacy, and compliance.

Laws 2020, LB962, § 6;

Laws 2022, LB1137, § 6;

Laws 2024, LB1393, § 5.